Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2251
Rules and regulations; state long-term care ombudsman; qualifications.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act. The department shall ensure that the state long-term care ombudsman has no conflicts of interest in fulfilling the duties of the office, is capable of administering the office impartially, has an understanding of long-term care issues, has experience in the fields of aging and health care, and has worked with and been involved in volunteer programs.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 770;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 15.